Indiana, session 2026, HB1245.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-8.5-13.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 13.5. (a) As used in this
section, "data center" has the meaning set forth in IC 8-1-45-3.
(b) As used in this section, "energy utility" means:
(1) an electric utility listed in 170 IAC 4-7-2(a) and any
successor in interest to that utility; or
(2) a corporation organized under IC 8-1-13.
(c) As used in this section, "large load customer" means a new
or existing customer of an energy utility, or not more than four (4)
multiple new or existing customers of an energy utility, that
requests new or additional electricity demand that in the aggregate
exceeds the lesser of:
(1) five percent (5%) of the energy utility's average peak
demand over the most recent three (3) calendar years; or
(2) one hundred fifty (150) megawatts.
The term includes a data center that meets the demand threshold
2026 IN 1245—LS 6933/DI 101


set forth in this subsection.
(d) The commission shall conduct a study to evaluate the effect
of new and additional electricity demand from data centers and
large load customers on:
(1) the costs incurred by energy utilities to meet that demand;
and
(2) retail electric rates for all customer classes of energy
utilities.
(e) In conducting the study, the commission shall evaluate the
following:
(1) Anticipated costs associated with the deployment of new
transmission and distribution infrastructure needed to serve
data centers and large load customers, considering existing
and planned transmission infrastructure and projected
demand growth.
(2) Potential costs associated with stranded assets that are
constructed or installed for data centers or large load
customers that:
(A) fail to commence commercial operation;
(B) fail to take electric service in the amounts and within
the time frames anticipated;
(C) discontinue electric service provided by an energy
utility; or
(D) cease commercial operation;
including the impact of those costs on an energy utility's
existing and future customers.
(3) The potential for investments made by energy utilities to
meet new and additional electricity demand from data centers
and large load customers to result in cross-class subsidies that
increase retail electric rates for residential customers and
other commercial or industrial customers.
(4) The potential for:
(A) more efficient uses of existing electric infrastructure,
such as the use of:
(i) advanced transmission technologies; or
(ii) surplus interconnection service; and
(B) the sharing of fixed energy costs across a larger overall
demand;
to lower costs for all customers of energy utilities.
(5) Any other data, forecasts, or information that the
commission determines will assist policymakers, energy
utilities, customers, and other stakeholders in understanding
2026 IN 1245—LS 6933/DI 101


the effect of new and additional electricity demand from data
centers and large load customers on:
(A) the costs incurred by energy utilities; and
(B) electric rates for customers.
(f) In conducting the study required by this section, the
commission may consult with or invite comments from:
(1) electric utilities;
(2) the office of utility consumer counselor;
(3) associations or organizations representing utility
ratepayers;
(4) regional transmission organizations;
(5) state and local economic development agencies or
organizations; and
(6) other stakeholders.
The commission may incorporate any information or comments
received under this subsection in its report under subsection (g).
(g) The commission shall include in the annual report that the
commission is required to submit under IC 8-1-1-14 before
October 1, 2026, a report that includes the commission's findings
with respect to the topics outlined in subsection (e).
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1245—LS 6933/DI 101